Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-914.01
Registered voter; change of name; entitled to vote; when.

If a person who is registered to vote changes his or her name but the voter registration register has not been changed to reflect the change of name, the person shall be entitled to vote at the polling place upon completing a registration application to update his or her voter registration record at the polling place. The election commissioner or county clerk shall update the voter registration register to reflect the change of name.

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 85;

Laws 1999, LB 234, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 35.